Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [182.6771] SUITABLE SEATING FOR EMPLOYEES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Suitable seating for employees required. new text end new text begin An employer must provide suitable seating for employees and must permit the use of those seats by employees when the nature of the work reasonably permits the use of seats. For purposes of this section, "suitable seating" means an adequate number of seats placed in reasonable proximity to the work area and includes any of the following types of seats that have support for an individual's back: a chair, stool, or bench. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin This section shall be enforced by the commissioner under sections 182.66 and 182.661. A violation of this section is subject to the penalties provided under section 182.666. new text end